Utah statutes.
67-1-9.   Governor's residence -- Sources of funds.

(1) The Kearns' mansion shall be the official residence of the governor.

(2)  The building board may apply for, accept and expend funds from federal and other sources for carrying out the purposes of Section 67-1-8.1 and this section.

